California, session 20252026, AB2360.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6219 of the Government Code is amended to read:6219. (a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Plain language” means language that is clear and easily understood by the intended audience, avoids unnecessary legal or technical jargon, and uses words, sentences, and structures that facilitate comprehension and accessibility for common literacy levels, including individuals with disabilities or limited English proficiency.(2) “State agency” means each department, commission, office, or other administrative agency of state government.(3) “State agency document” means any publicly available instruction, form, license, communication, regulation, manual, memorandum, or any other written communication that is necessary to carry out the state agency’s responsibilities under the law.(a)(b) Each state agency shall write each document that it produces, produces after January 1, 2027, either digitally or in print, in plain, straightforward plain language, avoiding technical terms as much as possible, and using a coherent and easily readable style.(b)Each state agency shall create, adopt, and post on its internet website a plain language policy that identifies how the state agency will incorporate or strengthen plain language writing and design principles and practices.(c) To implement this section, a state agency may use standards created by the Office of Data and Innovation that identify how a state agency incorporates plain language principles and practices. (c)(d) Within existing personnel and resources, the head of each state agency shall do all of the following:(1) Designate one or more senior officials within the state agency to oversee state agency implementation of this section.(2) Communicate the requirements of this section to the employees of the state agency.(3) Establish a process for overseeing the ongoing compliance of the state agency with the requirements of this section.(4)Within existing personnel resources, designate one or more state agency points of contact to receive and respond to public input, questions, comments, or suggestions on state agency implementation of this section, or on any state agency document that is not easily readable or in plain language.(d)As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Plain language” means language that is clear and easily understood by the intended audience, avoids unnecessary legal or technical jargon, and uses words, sentences, and structures that facilitate comprehension and accessibility for common literacy levels, including individuals with disabilities or limited English proficiency.(2)“State agency” means each department, commission, office, or other administrative agency of state government. (3)“State agency document” means any contract, form, license, announcement, regulation, manual, memorandum, or any other written communication that is necessary to carry out the state agency’s responsibilities under the law.